Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.120

Sheriff's duty on receiving writ—Order of executing writs.

The sheriff or other officer shall indorse upon the writ of execution in ink, the day, hour, and minute when the writ first came into his or her hands, and the execution shall be returned with a report of proceedings under the writ within sixty days after its date to the clerk who issued it. When there are several writs of execution or of execution and attachment against the same debtor, they shall be executed in the order in which they were received by the sheriff.

[ 1987 c 442 s 412; 1983 1st ex.s. c 45 s 1; 1929 c 25 s 5; RRS s 515. Prior: Code 1881 s 330; 1877 p 69 s 334; 1869 p 83 s 226; 1854 p 177 s 248. Formerly RCW 6.04.050.]